Georgia statutes. TITLE 11 Commercial Code
Article 11 Revised Article 9 and Conforming Amendments to Other Articles

11-11-101.
Effective date.

This Act shall become effective at 12:01 A.M. on July 1, 1978.

History. —
Code 1933, § 109A-11—101, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1081, § 8; Ga. L. 1980, p. 443, § 7; Ga. L. 2015, p. 996, § 3B-19/SB 65.

The 2015 amendment,

effective January 1, 2016, substituted the present provisions of this Code section for the former provisions, which read: “(1) This Act shall become effective at 12:01 A.M. on July 1, 1978.

“(2)
As used in this article:

“(a)
‘Old Article 9 of this title’ means Code Sections 11-1-105, 11-1-201(9), 11-1-201(37), 11-2-107, 11-5-116, and Article 9 of this title, as they are in effect on June 30, 1978, immediately prior to the effective date of this Act.

“(b)
‘Revised Article 9 of this title’ means Code Sections 11-1-105, 11-1-201(9), 11-1-201(37), 11-1-209, 11-2-107, 11-5-116, and Article 9 of this title as said provisions are enacted pursuant to this Act.”

11-11-102.
Preservation of old transition provisions.

The provisions of Article 10 of this title shall continue to apply to the revised Article 9 of this title.

History. —
Code 1933, § 109A-11—102, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1081, § 8.

11-11-103.
Transition to revised article.

Transactions validly entered into before July 1, 1978, and the rights, duties, and interests flowing from them remain valid thereafter; and, except as provided in subsection (2) of this Code section, may be terminated, completed, consummated, or enforced as required or permitted by old Article 9 of this title and other statute or other law amended or repealed by this Act as though such repeal or amendment had not occurred.

Continuation statements with respect to security interests perfected under the old Article 9 of this title shall, after December 31, 1977, be filed in the manner and place specified in the revised Article 9 of this title.

History. —
Code 1933, § 109A-11—103, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1081, § 8.

11-11-104.
Presumption that rule of law continues unchanged.

Unless a change in law has clearly been made, the provisions of the revised Article 9 of this title shall be deemed declaratory of the meaning of the old Article 9 of this title.

History. —
Code 1933, § 109A-11—104, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1081, § 8.